Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
CHAPTER 2 Georgia Industries for the Blind

Cross references.

Blindness education, screening, and treatment program, § 31-1-23.

30-2-1.
Creation.

There is created the Georgia Industries for the Blind.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 579, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1.

30-2-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of the industries is to furnish to those citizens of Georgia who are blind or who have not more than 10 percent vision a means of supporting themselves; to furnish an opportunity for those who are mentally gifted to earn a living by working in short shifts as well as to develop their talents for literature, poetry, music, or otherwise; and to furnish a home to workers who desire it.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 579, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1.

30-2-3.
Supervision of industries by Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency; acquisition of property.

The industries shall be state institutions under the direction and supervision of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is authorized to provide the property necessary for the industries. The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency may acquire real property through the State Properties Commission pursuant to Code Section 50-16-38 or the agency may enter into rental agreements in order to acquire the needed space.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 579, § 5; Ga. L. 1949, p. 544, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 172, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1220; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1017, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 5.1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 4/HB 1146.

30-2-4.
Superintendents for industries; operation of industries generally; purchase of goods manufactured at industries by state institutions.

There shall be superintendents for the industries. Preference shall be given to blind persons with the skill and experience to perform such jobs. The department shall provide for the equipment, maintenance, and management of the industries; shall provide for the selection and eligibility of applicants for admission to an industry; shall provide for the sale of supplies manufactured at the industries to the departments of the state, its subdivisions, and institutions, and to the federal government and other states and to individual and corporate dealers in such supplies; shall provide for housing, rationing, hours of labor, scale of pay, or division of profits, subject to this chapter; and shall provide all other rules for the proper management of the industries not in conflict with this chapter. The department shall procure necessary machinery, equipment, and furnishings for the industries; shall make contracts for power, lighting, and heating; and shall arrange for all other things necessary and proper for the conduct of the industries.

All departments, subdivisions, and institutions of the State of Georgia are directed to give preference in purchases to goods manufactured at the industries, provided said goods are of equal quality and competitive in price.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 579, § 6; Ga. L. 1960, p. 172, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1.

30-2-5.
Articles to be manufactured by industries.

The plan of operation of the industries shall be to manufacture supplies such as brooms, brushes, mops, mattresses, desks, and office, school, and other furniture which are in the capacity of the blind to make and which are extensively used by the various departments of the state, its political subdivisions, and its educational, penal, and other institutions; provided, however, that this enumeration is partial and not exclusive of articles that may be manufactured in the industries.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 579, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1.

30-2-6.
Authority of industry superintendents to permit work to be done in homes of workers.

Where, in the opinion of the industry superintendents, any part of the work necessary to the production of any commodity can be practically and satisfactorily done in the home of the worker, as in the hemming of towels or other needlework, the superintendents shall have authority to permit and to arrange for such work to be so done.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 579, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1.

30-2-7.
Compensation of workers; observance of and payment for state holidays.

Each worker in an industry who is otherwise entitled to share in the benefits provided for blind persons under Articles 1 and 3 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 shall, in addition to the amount received as compensation for his or her services in the industry, receive from the Department of Human Services such amount of public assistance as shall be determined in accordance with the regulations approved by the commissioner of human services.

All workers in the industries shall observe all holidays observed by other departments and agencies of the state government and shall receive their proportionate compensation for each holiday so observed. If any worker shall be compensated in such a manner that his or her daily compensation is not fixed, but rather is based upon a production basis, he or she shall receive by way of compensation for such observance of state holidays the average daily production compensation received by him or her during the immediately preceding 30 day period, holidays and Sundays excluded. The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is authorized and directed to pay such compensation from the funds appropriated to and available for the agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 579, § 8; Ga. L. 1963, p. 137, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 5.2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 5/HB 1146.

Cross references.

Public and legal holidays, §

1-4-1

.

30-2-8.
Promotion, demotion, and layoff of employees; transfer; departure and return of employees.

Whenever the skill and experience of two employees are relatively equal, seniority shall control in all questions of promotion, demotion, or layoff. When skill and merit are relatively equal between employees, the employee with the greater seniority shall have the first right to obtain or refuse any transfer. When any worker in the industries leaves to accept other employment outside the industries, he shall have the right to return to the industries within one year from the date of leaving and resume his former seniority and employee privileges.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 172, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1.

30-2-9.
Surplus funds retained as working capital.

Surplus funds designated as reserve funds accruing at the industries in any fiscal year shall not lapse to the state treasury but may be reserved by the industries as working capital.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 557, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 759, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 5.3.